Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB266.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the commissioner, each officer of the department, and each
individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class to:
(a) Detect and prevent crime;[,]
(b) Apprehend criminals;[,]
(c) Maintain law and order throughout the state;[,]
(d) [to ]Collect, classify, and maintain information useful for the detection of
crime and the identification, apprehension, and conviction of criminals ; and
(e) [ to ]Enforce the criminal, [as well as the ]motor vehicle, and traffic laws of
the Commonwealth.
(2) [To this end ]The commissioner, each officer of the department, and each individual
employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class is individually vested with the
powers of a peace officer and shall:
(a) Have in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters
and enforcement of [the ]laws [relating thereto ]as sheriffs, constables granted
peace officer powers, and police officers in their respective jurisdictions;[,]
and[ shall ]
(b) Possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter
made available to sheriffs, constables granted peace officer powers, and police
officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the
course of their employment.
(3) Any warrant of arrest may be executed by the commissioner, any officer of the
department, and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(4) The commissioner:
(a) May allow officers of the department to engage in law enforcement-related
Page 1 of 5
BR188700.100 - 1887 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1887
off-duty employment; and
(b) Shall establish policies and procedures related to the off-duty employment
of officers of the department.
Section 2. KRS 16.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The commissioner is the head and chief executive officer of the department.
He or she shall provide for himself or herself, each officer of the department,
and each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, under
the provisions of KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650, such uniforms, equipment, and
facilities, including motor vehicles, necessary to the performance of their
respective duties, but all uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor
vehicles, shall remain the property of the Commonwealth.
(b) The commissioner may sell through the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
under the provisions of KRS 45A.045 to 45A.650, such uniforms, equipment,
and facilities, including motor vehicles, as become unfit for use, and all
moneys received [therefrom ]shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited
to a revolving fund to be used by the department.
(2) The commissioner shall keep an inventory and shall charge against each officer and
each individual employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class the value of all
property of the department issued to him or her, and if it is determined by the
commissioner that any loss or destruction of property was due to the carelessness or
neglect of an officer or an individual employed as a Trooper R Class, then the value
of the property shall be deducted from the pay of the officer or the individual
employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class.
(3) (a) By agreement with the commissioner of highways of the Commonwealth, the
commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may provide for
the leasing of motor vehicles and accessories thereto, radio facilities and
equipment, office equipment, and other property or facilities, upon [such
Page 2 of 5
BR188700.100 - 1887 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1887
]terms and conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the
agreement[said agreement may provide].
(b) The commissioner of highways and the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police may further provide, by agreement, for the service and
repair at any state garage of motor vehicles or accessories thereto which are
owned, operated, or rented by the department, upon [such ]terms and
conditions and for [such ]compensation as provided in the agreement[said
agreement may provide].
(c) Subject to KRS Chapter 42, the department is authorized, by lease or
purchase, to acquire, maintain, and operate motor vehicles, and the officers of
said department, including the commissioner and individuals employed as a
Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, are authorized and empowered to operate
such motor vehicles in the course of their duties, and in carrying out the
purposes, responsibilities, and functions provided for in KRS 16.010 to
16.170.
(4) The commissioner shall establish local headquarters so as to best distribute the
officers, individuals employed as a Trooper R Class or CVE R Class, and
employees of the department throughout the various sections of the Commonwealth
where they will be most efficient in carrying out the provisions of KRS 16.010 to
16.199.
(5) The commissioner shall establish policies and procedures related to the approval
and use of uniforms, equipment, and facilities, including motor vehicles,
necessary in the performance of an officer's off-duty employment.
Section 3. KRS 44.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A passenger motor vehicle or vehicles may be purchased by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet for the use of the Governor and the Lieutenant Governor.
(2) Motor vehicles, including passenger motor vehicles, may be purchased by the
Page 3 of 5
BR188700.100 - 1887 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1887
Finance and Administration Cabinet as are deemed necessary by the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet or by the secretary of the Transportation
Cabinet for the discharge of the authorized duties and functions of the various
agencies of the state. The vehicles shall be used for official purposes only and for
no other purposes. The assignment of passenger motor vehicles to specific
individuals shall be discouraged but may be made upon approval by the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet of a written request to make the assignment
by the head of the agency involved.
(3) All motor vehicles purchased pursuant to this section shall be issued official license
plates and shall bear on one (1) door on each side the great seal of the
Commonwealth, and the words "For official use only." It shall not be necessary that
the vehicles purchased pursuant to subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this section bear
the seal and the words.
(4) (a) The Department of Revenue, Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the
Department of Law may, upon approval by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet of a written request by the head of the agency
involved, register a vehicle or vehicles under KRS 186.020 and be issued
regular license plates.
(b) Except as provided in Sections 1 and 2 of this Act, the vehicles shall be used
for law enforcement-related[investigatory] purposes only and for no other
purposes.
(5) The Administrative Office of the Courts may register a vehicle or vehicles used by
Justices and Judges of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals under KRS 186.020
and be issued regular license plates.
(6) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate[adopt]
administrative regulations in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to govern the use of those state-owned vehicles acquired pursuant to the
Page 4 of 5
BR188700.100 - 1887 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1887
provisions of this section.
(7) Any person violating subsections (2) and (4) of this section shall, on conviction[
thereof], be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS 44.990.
Page 5 of 5
BR188700.100 - 1887 - XXXX 3/5/2025 4:54 PM Jacketed